Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB744.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 61 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5912. Overwatch towers.(a) Staffing of overwatch towers.--At a correctional institution with an overwatch tower, an overwatch tower shall be manned by corrections officers during any outdoor inmate movement.(b) Exceptions.--Subsection (a) shall not apply to an overwatch tower from which inmates cannot be supervised during outdoor inmate movement.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:123456789101112131415161718 "Overwatch tower." A tall building, freestanding or as part of another structure, from which corrections officers can supervise inmates.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0744PN0794 - 2 - 1234